Maine, session 132, LD1263.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1105-A, sub-§1, ¶L, as amended by PL 2017, c. 460, Pt. F,
§2, is further amended to read:
L. Serious bodily injury of another person is in fact caused by the use of one or more
scheduled drugs, the scheduled drug trafficked by the defendant is a contributing factor
to the serious bodily injury of the other person and that drug is a schedule W drug. A
violation of this paragraph is a Class B crime; or
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §1105-A, sub-§1, ¶L-1 is enacted to read:
L-1. Serious bodily injury of another person resulting from an overdose is in fact
caused by the use of fentanyl powder and the fentanyl powder trafficked by the
defendant is a contributing factor of the serious bodily injury of the other person
resulting from the overdose. A violation of this paragraph is a Class A crime; or